Hawaii statutes.
[§346F-6] Nursing facility
sustainability fee assessment. (a) Nursing facilities shall pay the
nursing facility sustainability fee to the nursing facility
sustainability program special fund in accordance with this chapter.

(b) The department shall determine, with
agreement by the nursing facility trade associations located in Hawaii, the fee
rate prospectively for the applicable fiscal year.

(c) The department shall collect and each
nursing facility shall pay in twelve equal installments the nursing facility
sustainability fee in section 346F-5 on a monthly basis, subject to the
terms of this section. The fee shall be due within thirty days after the end
of each month, with the initial payment due on the later of July 31, 2012, or
forty-five days after the required federal approvals for the assessment and any
increase in health plan capitation payments have been secured from the Centers
for Medicare and Medicaid Services. [L 2012, c 156, pt of §2, §5; am L 2013, c
142, §3; am L 2014, c 124, §2; am L 2015, c 69, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next